Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB217.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.936 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The General Assembly hereby establishes the statewide Healthcare Worker Loan
Relief Program designed to be in alignment with the federally funded state loan
repayment program authorized under KRS 211.165, except as provided in
subsection (3) of this section, in providing student loan repayment for eligible
healthcare workers within the Commonwealth. The Healthcare Worker Loan Relief
Program shall be administered by the University of Kentucky through the Center of
Excellence in Rural Health, and all costs associated with the program, including the
reimbursement of any expenses incurred by the center in its administration of the
program, shall be funded by state appropriations and other funds held in the
healthcare worker loan relief fund, which shall be excluded from the comprehensive
funding model established in KRS 164.092.
(2) The board of trustees of the University of Kentucky, on behalf of the Center of
Excellence in Rural Health, shall adopt policies for the administration of the
program that are in alignment with the policies implemented in the administration
of KRS 211.165 and the federally funded state loan repayment program it
authorizes, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, and shall include:
(a) The professional, certification, education, employment, and worksite
eligibility requirements, except that the professional requirements shall also
grant eligibility to ophthalmologists, optometrists, and audiologists;
(b) Student loan eligibility requirements;
(c) A process to consider applications from eligible healthcare workers, except
the policy shall include an application cycle that is open at least biannually;
(d) Program admission guidelines;
Page 1 of 8
XXXX 2/19/2026 11:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1153
(e) The conditions under which admitted healthcare workers shall receive awards;
(f) To the extent that funding is available, the process for determining award
amounts, which shall include the tiering of award amounts based on provider
type, student loan amounts, and other factors, except that the policy shall not
require a dollar-for-dollar match component from admitted healthcare
workers' employers; and
(g) Procedures to provide repayment to loan servicers.
(3) Until July 1, 2036, unless extended by an act of the General Assembly:
(a) A dentist, as defined in KRS 313.010, who is admitted to the Healthcare
Worker Loan Relief Program shall be eligible for up to five (5) consecutive
years of service and a total maximum loan repayment award of one
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000). A dentist who practices dentistry
in a Kentucky county that does not have an actively practicing dentist on the
effective date of the service agreement shall be eligible for an additional one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in loan repayment; and
(b) A dentist owning a practice in a federally designated health professional
shortage area shall be eligible for a rural dental practice grant under the
Healthcare Worker Loan Relief Program for an award of up to one
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000). Funds provided in this
paragraph shall be used for any of the following purposes:
1. Dental equipment and instruments;
2. Office renovation or construction;
3. Installation of electronic health record systems; or
4. Staffing and hiring costs.
(4) Funds appropriated to the Center of Excellence in Rural Health for the purpose
of subsection (3) of this section shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Seventy-five percent (75%) shall be utilized for student loan repayment for
Page 2 of 8
XXXX 2/19/2026 11:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1153
dentists under subsection (3)(a) of this section; and
(b) Twenty-five percent (25%) shall be utilized for rural dental practice grants
under subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(5) (a) The healthcare worker loan relief fund is hereby created as a trust fund in the
State Treasury to be administered by the University of Kentucky on behalf of
the Center of Excellence in Rural Health for the purpose of providing loan
repayment and rural dental practice grants as described in this section.
(b) The trust fund shall consist of state general fund appropriations, gifts and
grants from public and private sources, and federal funds. All moneys
included in the fund shall be appropriated for the purposes set forth in this
section.
(c) Any unallotted or unencumbered balances in the trust fund shall be invested
as provided in KRS 42.500(9). Income earned from the investments shall be
credited to the trust fund.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any fund balance at the close of the fiscal year
shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year and
continuously appropriated only for the purposes specified in this section.
Section 2. KRS 164.937 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The University of Kentucky shall maintain a Center of Excellence in Rural Health.
(2) The mission of the Center of Excellence in Rural Health shall be the improvement
of the health of all rural Kentuckians and the improvement of rural health care
systems through education, research, and service.
(3) The Center of Excellence in Rural Health shall:
(a) Support a site-based director, core faculty, and staff;
(b) Collect and maintain statistical and other information relating to rural health
status, rural health care systems, rural health policy, and other issues affecting
the health and well-being of rural populations;
Page 3 of 8
XXXX 2/19/2026 11:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1153
(c) Collect, analyze, interpret, disseminate, and make recommendations regarding
the availability, distribution, and sufficiency of the health professions
workforce;
(d) Provide educational opportunities for students committed to rural health care:
1. To obtain education in needed health professions as determined by the
workforce analyses, rotating these programs as necessary;
2. By testing and developing innovative models for learning; and
3. By reserving funds budgeted for specific educational programs that in
the future are deemed no longer necessary for use for educational
programs for other health professions;
(e) Maintain site-based family practice residencies;
(f) Serve as the federally designated Office of Rural Health and perform the
duties prescribed by the United States Health Resources and Services
Administration;
(g) Administer the Healthcare Worker Loan Relief Program established under
KRS 164.936;
(h) Demonstrate or provide innovative programs that improve the health of rural
Kentuckians and strengthen rural health care systems; and
(i) Advocate for rural health care.
(4) To the extent additional funds are appropriated, the Center of Excellence in Rural
Health shall establish additional sites throughout the Commonwealth as necessary
to achieve the mission of the center.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the study of rural health
policies, workforce analyses, or the training of health professionals in or for rural or
medically underserved areas by other state universities.
(6) (a) The University of Kentucky shall report to the Council on Postsecondary
Education and the Legislative Research Commission a detailed, audited
Page 4 of 8
XXXX 2/19/2026 11:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1153
statement of expenditures for each program function in the Center of
Excellence for Rural Health Care by September 1 of each year which
enumerates expenditures for the preceding fiscal year.
(b) Until July 1, 2036, unless extended by an act of the General Assembly, the
report under this subsection shall include, at a minimum, the following
additional information on the Healthcare Worker Loan Relief Program:
1. The number of participating dentists and dentistry practices;
2. The geographic distribution of participating dentists and dentistry
practices, including identification of participating dentists and
dentistry practices located in federally designated health professional
shortage areas;
3. Retention rates of participating dentists and dentistry practices;
4. State patient access metrics; and
5. Program expenditures.
Section 3. KRS 313.035 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A relating to dentists. The administrative regulations shall include the
classification of and licensure of dentists, by examination or credentials, the
licensure of specialists, student limited licenses, faculty limited licenses,
reciprocity, retirement of a license, reinstatement of a license, charity licenses,[
and] conscious sedation and anesthesia permits, and the Rural Dental Fellows
Network.
(2) Renewal programs shall be organized to include continuing education approved by
the board.
(3) For the purposes of licensure of specialists the board shall only recognize fields of
specialty duly recognized and approved by the American Dental Association.
Individuals licensed as specialists shall not practice outside of that specialty except
Page 5 of 8
XXXX 2/19/2026 11:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1153
as provided for in charitable dentistry as defined by administrative regulation,
during a declared disaster by order of the Governor, or when the special needs of
the patient require they be followed past the age of eighteen (18) by a pediatric
dentist.
(4) No person licensed under this chapter, who in good faith renders emergency care at
the scene of an emergency, shall be liable for any civil damages as a result of any
acts or omissions by such person in rendering the emergency care.
(5) Any dentist who serves on any committee, board, commission, or other entity
which is duly constituted by any licensed hospital, dental society or association
affiliated with the American Dental Association, dental care foundation affiliated
with such dental society or association or governmental or quasi-governmental
agency for the purpose of reviewing and evaluating the dental acts of other dentists,
or dental auxiliary personnel, shall not be required to respond in damages for any
action taken by him or her in good faith as a member of such committee, board,
commission, or other entity.
(6) Licensed dentists may prescribe any drug necessary within the scope of their
practice.
(7) Dentists may sign death certificates the same as physicians, when necessary in the
line of their profession.
(8) Nothing in this chapter shall apply to a legally licensed doctor of medicine unless
he or she practices dentistry as a specialty.
(9) Nothing in this chapter shall apply to a practitioner of dentistry duly licensed by
another state or the District of Columbia while making a clinical demonstration
before a dental society, convention, association of dentists, or a dental school.
(10) (a) The board shall pilot a Rural Dental Fellows Network for the purpose of the
retention of dental professionals in the Commonwealth, to be available to
all Kentucky dentists, to provide:
Page 6 of 8
XXXX 2/19/2026 11:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1153
1. Individual stipends for renewal programs in accordance with
subsection (2) of this section;
2. Mentorship programs;
3. Telehealth access in accordance with KRS 313.060;
4. Annual regional convenings;
5 Access to the Rural Dental Fellows Network at no cost for all dentists
awarded funding under subsection (3) of Section 1 of this Act; and
(b) The board shall operate the pilot until July 1, 2036, unless extended by an
act of the General Assembly.
Section 4. The Kentucky Department for Medicaid Services shall increase
reimbursement rates for dental services delivered to Medicaid beneficiaries in a federally
designated health professional shortage area by twenty-five percent (25%). A state-
funded technical assistance unit shall provide credentialing and billing support for rural
providers.
Section 5. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of:
(1) $4,400,000 in each fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium to the Center
of Excellence in Rural Health budget unit under the University of Kentucky for the
purpose of subsection (3) of Section 1 of this Act;
(2) $600,000 in each fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium to the Office of
the Kentucky Board of Dentistry for the purpose of implementation of the Rural Dental
Fellows Network created in Section 3 of this Act; and
(3) $1,000,000 in each fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium to the
Department for Medicaid Services for the purpose of providing increased reimbursement
rates in accordance with Section 4 of this Act.
Section 6. If the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or the Department for
Medicaid Services determines that a state plan amendment, waiver, or any other form of
authorization or approval from any federal agency to implement Section 4 of this Act is
Page 7 of 8
XXXX 2/19/2026 11:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1153
necessary to prevent the loss of federal funds or to comply with federal law, the cabinet
or department:
(1) Shall, within 90 days after the effective date of this Act, request the necessary
federal authorization or approval to implement Section 4 of this Act; and
(2) May only delay implementation of the provisions of Section 4 of this Act for
which federal authorization or approval was deemed necessary until the federal
authorization or approval is granted.
Section 7. Whereas it is critical to ensure the provision of accessible dental care
to the citizens of the Commonwealth, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act
takes effect July 1, 2026.
Section 8. This Act may be cited as the Rural Dental Incentive and Access
Program Act.
Page 8 of 8
XXXX 2/19/2026 11:21 AM Jacketed